Utah statutes.
73-18a-12.   Rules promulgated by board -- Subject to approval by Department of Environmental Quality.

The board may promulgate rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, which are necessary for the carrying out of duties, obligations, and powers conferred on the division by this chapter.  These rules shall be subject to review and approval by the Department of Environmental Quality.  This approval shall be recorded as part of the rules.

